Missouri, session 2026, SB1310.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 383.155, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 383.155,
to read as follows:
383.155. 1. A joint underwriting association may be
created, or directed to resume operations, upon
determination by the director after a public hearing that
medical malpractice liability insurance is not reasonably
available for health care providers in the voluntary
market. The association shall contain as members all
companies authorized to write and engaged in writing, on a
direct basis, any insurance or benefit, the premium for
which is included under the definition of "net direct
premiums". Membership in the association shall be a
condition of continued authority to do business in this
state.
2. A plan of operation shall be adopted to be
effective concurrently with the effective date of the
association.
3. The association shall, pursuant to the provisions
of sections 383.150 to 383.195 and the plan of operation,

SB 1310 2
with respect to medical malpractice insurance, have the
authority on behalf of its members:
(1) To issue, or to cause to be issued, policies of
insurance to applicants, including incidental coverages and
subject to limits as specified in the plan of operation but
not to exceed one million dollars for each claimant under
one policy and three million dollars for all claimants under
one policy in any one policy year;
(2) To underwrite such insurance and to adjust and pay
losses with respect thereto, or to appoint a service company
to perform those functions;
(3) To assume reinsurance from its members; and
(4) To cede reinsurance.
4. Within forty-five days following the creation of
the association, the directors of the association shall
submit to the director for his or her review, a proposed
plan of operation, consistent with the provisions of
sections 383.150 to 383.195.
5. The plan of operation shall provide for economic,
fair and nondiscriminatory administration and for the prompt
and efficient distribution of medical malpractice insurance,
and shall contain other provisions including, but not
limited to, preliminary assessment of all members for
initial expenses to commence operations, establishment of
necessary facilities, management of the association,
assessment of members to defray losses and expenses,
reasonable and objective underwriting standards, acceptance
and cession of reinsurance, appointment of a servicing
company and procedures for determining amounts of insurance
to be provided by the association. The preliminary
assessment shall be an advance to be recouped under the
provisions of subsection 5 of section 383.160.

SB 1310 3
6. The composition of the board and the terms of
directors of the board shall be established by the plan of
operation.
7. The plan of operation shall be subject to approval
by the director after consultation with the members of the
association, representatives of the public and other
affected individuals and organizations. If the director
disapproves all or any part of the proposed plan of
operation, the directors shall within fifteen days submit
for review a revised plan of operation. If the directors
fail to do so, the director shall promulgate a plan of
operation or part thereof, as the case may be. The plan of
operation approved or promulgated by the director shall
become effective and operational upon his or her order.
8. Amendments to the plan of operation may be made by
the directors of the association, subject to the approval of
the director or shall be made at his direction.
9. There shall be no liability imposed on the part of
and no cause of action of any nature shall arise against any
member insurer or any member of the board of directors for
any omission or action taken by them in the performance of
their powers and duties under sections 383.150 to 383.195.
10. (1) The directors of the board may suspend the
operations of the association if the directors determine
that medical malpractice insurance is reasonably available
to health care providers in the voluntary market if there
are two or fewer individual physicians insured annually for
at least two consecutive years.
(2) Suspension of operations of the association is to
be in accordance with its plan of operation, or any
amendment thereto. The plan of operation shall establish
the process for suspension of operations and shall include

SB 1310 4
provisions for the administration of association funds until
the director determines either to resume operations under
subsection 1 of this section, or to terminate operations in
compliance with section 383.195.
(3) During any period of suspension, the association
shall not collect dues or fees from its members unless and
until the director authorizes an assessment or authorizes
the resumption of operations as provided herein.
(4) As used in this section, "reasonably available"
shall mean that medical malpractice insurance products are
offered to health care providers through voluntary markets
by insurance carriers in the ordinary course of business.
✓